Missouri, session 2026, SB1656.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.014, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 144.014,
to read as follows:
144.014. 1. Notwithstanding other provisions of law
to the contrary, [beginning October 1, 1997, the tax levied
and imposed under this chapter on] all retail sales of food
shall be [at the rate of one percent. The revenue derived
from the one percent rate pursuant to this section shall be
deposited by the state treasurer in the school district
trust fund and shall be distributed as provided in section
144.701] exempted from the provisions of and from the
computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable pursuant
to this chapter. The provisions of this subsection are
intended to exempt the sale of food from the state sales tax
rate imposed pursuant to this chapter, and the department of
revenue shall not construe the provisions of this subsection
as an exemption from the local sales tax law, as defined in
section 32.085.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term "food"
shall include only those products and types of food for
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1656 2
which food stamps may be redeemed pursuant to the provisions
of the Federal Food Stamp Program as contained in 7 U.S.C.
Section 2012, as that section now reads or as it may be
amended hereafter, and shall include food dispensed by or
through vending machines. For the purpose of this section,
except for vending machine sales, the term "food" shall not
include food or drink sold by any establishment where the
gross receipts derived from the sale of food prepared by
such establishment for immediate consumption on or off the
premises of the establishment constitutes more than eighty
percent of the total gross receipts of that establishment,
regardless of whether such prepared food is consumed on the
premises of that establishment, including, but not limited
to, sales of food by any restaurant, fast food restaurant,
delicatessen, eating house, or café.
✓